Maine, session 132, LD410.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1509 is enacted to read:
§1509. Parental consent required for restrictions on life-sustaining measures
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Do-not-resuscitate order" means an order in a minor's medical record to not use
cardiopulmonary resuscitation measures if the minor's heart or breathing stops. "Do-
not-resuscitate order" does not include withholding a medical intervention to provide
a minor with comfort care or to alleviate pain.
B. "Facility" means a facility licensed under chapter 405 or 1663.
C. "Minor" means a person under 18 years of age who is unemancipated, not under
state supervision and not on active duty in the state military forces or the United States
Armed Forces, including the National Guard or Reserves.
D. "Resident" means a person who is residing in a facility.
2. Parental or legal guardian authority. A health care practitioner, health care
provider or facility may not:
A. Withhold, withdraw or place any restrictions on life-sustaining measures for a
minor without the written consent of a parent or legal guardian of the minor;
B. Institute a do-not-resuscitate order or similar physician's order for a minor without
the written consent of a parent or legal guardian of the minor;
C. Interfere with the efforts of a parent or legal guardian of a minor to obtain a medical
opinion about the minor's medical condition or transfer the minor to another health care
provider or facility;
D. Refuse to provide immediate access to a minor, or the medical records of a minor,
to a health care practitioner, health care provider or facility designated by a parent or
legal guardian of the minor; or
E. Hinder or delay the efforts of a parent or legal guardian of a minor to obtain
necessary measures, mechanisms or procedures for the minor, including an immediate
tracheostomy or gastrostomy tube required to facilitate a transfer to another health care
provider or facility.
3. Revocation of consent. A parent or legal guardian of a minor may revoke in writing
consent given under subsection 2, paragraph A or B. A revocation under this subsection
takes precedence over any prior consent and must be immediately recorded in the minor's
medical records specifying who revoked the consent, who, if anyone, witnessed the
revocation and the date and time the revocation was given.
4. Failure to contact. The provisions of subsection 2, paragraph A or B do not apply
if the health care practitioner, health care provider or facility makes a reasonably diligent
and documented effort to contact a parent or legal guardian of the minor within a 72-hour
period.
5. Duties of health care practitioner, health care provider or facility. A health
care practitioner, health care provider or facility shall:
Page 1 - 132LR0822(01)

A. If a parent or legal guardian of a minor requests a transfer under subsection 2,
paragraph C, continue the provision of life-sustaining measures, including artificially
administered nutrition and hydration, until the transfer and make every reasonable
effort to assist in the transfer process; and
B. Upon the request of a parent or legal guardian of a minor in the care of the health
care practitioner, health care provider or facility, disclose verbally and in writing any
policies of the health care practitioner, health care provider or facility regarding
resuscitation, life-sustaining measures or measures considered nonbeneficial,
ineffective, futile or inappropriate for patients or residents. This paragraph does not
require a health care practitioner, health care provider or facility to have a policy
regarding resuscitation, life-sustaining measures or measures considered
nonbeneficial, ineffective, futile or inappropriate for patients or residents.
6. Parental and legal guardian authority. A parent or legal guardian of a minor
maintains all rights under this section unless there is destruction of the circulatory and
respiratory systems and the entire brain of the minor.
7. Presumption of continuation of life. There is a presumption that the continuation
of life is in a minor's best interest, and a court may not order the withdrawal of life-
sustaining measures from a minor over the objections of a parent or legal guardian of the
minor unless there is destruction of the circulatory and respiratory systems and the entire
brain of the minor.